California statutes. Elections Code
 official shall publish a notice of the facts described in this section and the courses of action available under this subdivision. Publication shall be made pursuant to Section 6061 of the Government Code in any newspaper of general circulation as designated by the city elections official.

After the fifth day following the date of posting or publication, the governing body of the city may make the appointment or direct an election to be held in the affected territory. The person appointed, if any, shall qualify and take office and serve exactly as if elected at a municipal election for the office.

Notwithstanding Section 10403, if, by the 75th day before the municipal election, no person has been appointed to office pursuant to paragraph (1) or (2), the election shall be held.

(b) Subdivision (a) shall not apply if, at the regularly scheduled municipal election, more than one person has been nominated to another city office to be elected on a citywide basis or a city measure has qualified and is to be submitted to the voters at that
 municipal election.

(c) Notwithstanding Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 8600) of Part 3 of Division 8, or any other provision of the law to the contrary, if the governing body of a city makes an appointment pursuant to subdivision (a), the elections official shall not accept for filing any statement of write-in candidacy that is submitted after the appointment is made.

(d) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent a city from enacting an ordinance pursuant to Section 36512 of the Government Code, requiring that a special election be held, or from enacting an ordinance pursuant to Section 36512 of the Government Code, providing that a person appointed to fill a vacancy on the city council shall hold office only until the date of the special
 election, or both. Any ordinance or ordinances may allow for appointment consistent with subdivision (a) without requiring or providing for a special election.

If an appointment to office is made in a particular legislative district pursuant to subdivision (a), that appointment shall not affect the conduct of the municipal election in other legislative districts of the city.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 355, Sec. 11.   (AB 1784)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

10230.

If the date of a general municipal election is changed by municipal ordinance pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 10403.5 or by charter, the period to file as a candidate for the general municipal election shall be the same as the nomination period to file as a candidate for the election in which the general municipal election is consolidated, notwithstanding Section 10220.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1143, Sec. 46.5.   Effective September 30, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Conduct of Elections [10240. - 10243.]

10240.

The city elections official shall have the necessary ballots printed and shall procure and furnish to the election officers the necessary supplies and equipment as specified in Sections 14105 and 14110. The elections official shall see that they are properly distributed to each precinct prior to the opening of the polls on the day of election.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

10241.

Before opening the polls, the election officers shall sign a declaration to discharge faithfully the duties of an election officer, before the inspector or before any other of themselves.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

10242.

The polls shall be open on the day of election between the hours that the governing body determines, but not less than eight consecutive hours. The hours of opening and closing the polls shall be specified in the notice of election, or shall otherwise be the same as provided for general elections. Before the precinct board receives any ballots, it shall cause it to be proclaimed aloud at the place of election that the polls are open.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

10243.

A majority of the members of any precinct board shall be present at the polling place at all times while the polling place is open.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Canvass of Ballots and Returns [10260. - 10266.]

10260.

The votes shall be counted, the result of the votes cast shall be posted, the supplies and records of the election shall be returned to the city elections official and shall be disposed of by him or her in accordance with the provisions of this code governing elections generally, so far as they may be applicable.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

10261.

The city elections official, or a canvassing board appointed by him or her, shall count the votes cast by vote by mail voters. The city elections official or board shall commence this count as soon as the polls close on the day of election, and the count shall continue, for not less than six hours each day providing ballots remain to be counted, until all vote by mail voter ballots have been received within the time provided by law. The result of the vote by mail vote count shall be included with the canvass of returns from the precincts.

The canvassing board, if any, shall be appointed, and the vote by mail vote count shall be conducted in the manner prescribed by Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 15000) of Division 15, insofar as that chapter is not inconsistent with this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 508, Sec. 67.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

10262.

The canvass shall be conducted by the elections official. Sections 15302 and 15303 shall govern the conduct of the canvass. Upon the completion of the canvass, the elections official shall certify the results to the governing body.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), the canvass shall be completed by the elections official no later than the fourth Friday after the election. Upon completion of the canvass, the elections official shall certify the results to the governing body which shall, no later than the fourth Friday after the election, comply with the applicable provisions of Section 10263.

(b) For a consolidated election, the city elections official, upon receipt of the results of the election from the elections official conducting the election, shall certify the results to the governing body which shall, no later than the next regularly scheduled city council meeting following presentation of the 28-day canvass of the returns, or at a special meeting called for this purpose, comply with the applicable provisions of Section 10263.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 785, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

10263.

Upon the completion of the canvass and before installing the new officers, the governing body shall adopt a resolution reciting the fact of the election and the other matters that are enumerated in Section 10264. The governing body shall declare elected the persons for whom the highest number of votes were cast for each office.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), the governing body shall meet at its usual place of meeting no later than the fourth Friday after the election to declare the results and to install the newly elected officers.

(b) For a consolidated election, the governing body shall meet at its usual place of meeting no later than the next regularly scheduled city council meeting following presentation of the 28-day canvass of the returns, or at a special meeting called for this purpose, to declare the results and to install the newly elected officers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 785, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

10264.

As soon as the result of the election is declared, the elections official of the governing body shall enter on its records a statement of the result.

The statement shall show:

(a) The whole number of votes cast in the city.

(b) The names of the persons voted for.

(c) The measures voted upon.

(d) For what office each person was voted for.

(e) The number of votes given at each precinct to each person and for and against each measure.

(f) The number of votes given in the city to each person and for and against each measure.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

10265.

The elections official shall immediately sign and deliver to each person elected a certificate of election. He or she shall also administer to each person elected the oath of office prescribed in the California Constitution.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

10266.

Recount of votes in municipal elections shall be governed by Article 1 (commencing with Section 15600) of Chapter 12 of Division 15.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Emergency Elections in Cities [10300. - 10312.]

10300.

The voters of a city may present a petition to the Governor for the appointment of three commissioners of election pursuant to this chapter if:

(a) The city has failed to elect officers in accordance with its charter, and there are no officers to carry on the city government, or the city has failed to call an election of officers.

(b) The city has attempted to adopt a freeholders charter under the State Constitution, and has failed to legally elect officers, and the freeholders charter is held to be invalid.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

10301.

The petition to the Governor shall set forth:

(a) The name of the city, with the date and manner of organization.

(b) The date of the last election for officers; whether they are performing their duties, and if not, how long since they have ceased to do so.

(c) The provision of the charter relating to the qualifications of voters.

(d) That each person signing the petition possesses the qualifications provided for voters by the charter.

(e) That each of the signers of the petition is a householder and freeholder in the city.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

10302.

The petition shall be signed by not less than 75 persons in the city, each of whom possesses all the qualifications mentioned in the body of the petition. The petition shall be verified by at least two of the signers, that, of their own knowledge, the petition is true, and that all the signers are qualified.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

10303.

Upon the presentation of the petition to the Governor, he or she shall either act upon it or require additional evidence of the matters set forth in the petition. Upon being satisfied of the truth of the matters set forth in the petition, the Governor shall appoint three persons as commissioners of election for that city. The commission shall be known as the board of election commissioners for (here give name of the city).

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

10304.

The Governor shall issue a commission to the commissioners, and the issuance of the commission shall be conclusive evidence of the regularity of all the proceedings to and including the appointment of the commissioners. Within 10 days after their appointment, the commissioners shall take the constitutional oath of office before some officer authorized to administer oaths. The oath shall be indorsed upon the commission, and a copy filed in the office of the Secretary of State. The commission shall organize by the election of a president and secretary from their own members. The commission shall keep minutes of all its proceedings, which minutes shall be signed at the close of each meeting by the president and secretary.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

10305.

The commissioners may, by an order entered in their minutes, call an election for the officers required by the charter of the city, to be elected only by the voters in the city. The order shall specify the names of the offices to be filled and the date of the election. When any office is to be filled by an election in any ward or subdivision of the city, the order shall so state.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

10306.

Prior to the election, the commission shall appoint precinct boards and fix the places of holding the election, as required in the city charter. The commission shall cause notice of the election to be published in one or more newspapers published in the city, or if none is published therein, then by posting notices for at least 20 days before election. The election shall be conducted as required by the city charter for the election of officers, except that it shall not be necessary to use printed registers. If a voter is challenged on the ground that his or her name does not appear on the register of the county, it shall be sufficient for him or her to state, under oath, that he or she believes his or her name is upon the register, and if no other evidence is offered, the precinct board shall accept that statement as true.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

10307.

Except that the returns shall be returned and delivered to the commission, the precinct boards shall make return of the election as required in the charter of all officers voted for at the election, without reference to whether they were voted for in the whole or only a ward or subdivision of the city. A member of a precinct board shall not issue a certificate of election.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

10308.

Within five days after the election, the commissioners shall canvass the returns and declare which persons were elected. The commission shall issue certificates of election to the persons so declared to be elected. The certificates shall be signed by all the commissioners, and shall be conclusive evidence of the regularity of all the proceedings taken in the election and by the commission, except as against any suit or proceeding to oust from office any person holding a certificate.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

10309.

Within 10 days after issuance of the certificates of election, the officers shall qualify and enter upon the discharge of their duties, in accordance with the charter. If any person chosen at the election fails to take the oath of office and enter upon the discharge of his or her duties within the time above specified, the office to which he or she shall have been elected shall be deemed vacant.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

10310.

At the first meeting of the governing body of the city after the election, the commissioners shall deliver to the governing body all books and papers in their possession, relating to their office of election commissioners. The governing body shall cause them to be filed by their elections official, and shall cause the commission issued by the Governor to the commissioners, the minutes of the commissioners, and notice of the election to be entered in the book of minutes of the governing body. These entries shall thereupon be evidence of all the matters therein stated, and as conclusive as the originals.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

10311.

Whenever the officers elected at the election, and the officers authorized by the charter to be elected or appointed by the governing body or executive department of the city, have qualified and entered upon the discharge of their duties, the city shall be as fully organized and in operation as if the election had been held at the time and in the manner required by the charter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

10312.

Whenever the government of the city is in full operation, the governing body shall enter a resolution in its minutes declaring that fact. The resolution shall be conclusive evidence of that fact, except as against a direct action or proceeding to set aside or annul the government.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 3. CONSOLIDATION OF ELECTIONS [10400. - 10418.]

10400.

Whenever two or more elections, including bond elections, of any legislative or congressional district, public district, city, county or other political subdivision are called to be held on the same day, in the same territory, or in territory that is in part the same, they may be consolidated pursuant to this chapter upon the order of the governing body or bodies or officer or officers calling the elections.

The elections, whether held under a freeholder charter or under any state law, or both, may be consolidated, and different elections called by the same governing body may be consolidated.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 199, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

10401.

Where one of the elections to be consolidated is a statewide election, the board of supervisors of the county in which the consolidation is to be effected may order the consolidation.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

10402.

When local elections are to be consolidated, and no specific procedure is specified for their consolidation, the procedure set forth in Section 10403 shall govern the consolidation, except that the governing body of the jurisdiction that receives a request for the consolidation, or an officer otherwise authorized by law, may order the consolidation.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

10402.5.

Any state, county, municipal, district, and school district election held on a statewide election date pursuant to Section 1002 shall be consolidated with the statewide election pursuant to this part except that, in counties of the first class, the board of supervisors may deny any request for consolidation if it finds that the ballot style, voting equipment, or computer capacity is such that additional elections or materials cannot be handled. The procedural requirements prescribed for that type of election shall be construed as if this section were specifically set forth in the provisions relating to that election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1143, Sec. 47.   Effective September 30, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

10403.

(a) Whenever an election called by a district, city, or other political subdivision for the submission of a question, proposition, or office to be filled is to be consolidated with a statewide election, and the question, proposition, or office to be filled is to appear upon the same ballot as that provided for
 the statewide election, the district, city, or other political subdivision shall, at least 88 days prior to the date of the election, file with the board of supervisors, and a copy with the elections official, a resolution of its governing board that does all of the following:

(1) Requests that the district, city, or other political subdivision election be consolidated with the statewide election.

(2) Sets forth the exact form of the question, proposition, or office to be voted upon at the election, as it is to appear on the ballot. The question or proposition to appear on the ballot shall conform to this code governing the wording of propositions submitted to the voters at a statewide election.

(3) Acknowledges that the consolidated election will be held and conducted in the manner prescribed in Section 10418.

(b) The resolution requesting the consolidation shall be adopted and filed at the same time as the adoption of the ordinance, resolution, or order calling the election.

(c) The names of the candidates to appear upon the ballot where district, city, or other political subdivision offices are to be filled shall be filed with the county elections official no later than 81 days prior to the election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 98, Sec. 1.   (AB 331)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

10403.5.

(a) (1) Any city ordinance requiring its general municipal election to be held on a day specified in subdivision (b) of Section 1301 shall be approved by the board of supervisors unless the ballot style, voting equipment, or computer capability is such that additional elections or materials cannot be handled. Prior to adoption of a resolution to either approve or deny a consolidation request, the board or boards of supervisors shall each obtain from the elections official a report on the cost-effectiveness of the proposed action.

(2) A city, by itself or in concert with other cities, may purchase or otherwise contribute to the purchase of elections equipment, including, but not limited to, a computer for the purposes of conducting a consolidated election when the equipment shall be owned by the county.

(b) As a result of the adoption of an ordinance pursuant to this section, no term of office shall be increased or decreased by more than 12 months. As used in this subdivision, “12 months” means the period between the day upon which the term of office would otherwise have commenced and the first Tuesday after the second Monday in the 12th month before or after that day, inclusive.

(c) If an election is held on a day specified in subdivision (b) of Section 1301, and the election is consolidated with another election this part, except Section 10403, shall govern the consolidation and, if the county elections official is requested to conduct the municipal election, Section 10002 shall be applicable to that election.

(d) If a general municipal election is held on the same day as a statewide election, those city officers whose terms of office would have, prior to the adoption of the ordinance, expired no later than the next regularly scheduled city council meeting after receipt of the certification of the results from the elections official shall, instead, continue in their offices until not later than that meeting.

(e) Within 30 days after the ordinance becomes operative, the city elections official shall cause a notice to be mailed to all registered voters informing the voters of the change in the election date. The notice shall also inform the voters that as a result in the change in the election date, the terms of office of the elected city officeholders will be changed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 785, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

10404.

(a) This section applies only to special districts electing members of the governing body in odd-numbered years. As used in this section, “special district” means an agency of the state formed pursuant to general law or special act, for the local performance of governmental or proprietary functions within limited boundaries, except a city, county, city and county, school or community college district, or special assessment district.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, a governing body of a special district may, by resolution, require that its elections of governing
 body members be held on the same day as the statewide general election.

(1) The resolution setting the election shall also include dates that are consistent with the primary or general election with respect to nominations, notices, canvass of votes, certification of election, and all other procedural requirements of this code pertaining to the primary or general election.

(2) The resolution shall be submitted to the board of supervisors no later than 240 days prior to the date of the currently scheduled district election.

(c) The board of supervisors shall notify all districts located in the county of the receipt of the resolution to consolidate and shall request input from each district on the effect of consolidation.

(d) The elections official shall prepare and transmit to the board of supervisors an impact analysis of the proposed consolidation.

(e) The board of supervisors, within 60 days from the date of submission, shall approve the resolution unless it finds that the ballot style, voting equipment, or computer capacity is such that additional elections or materials cannot be handled. Prior to the adoption of a resolution to either approve or deny a consolidation request, the board or boards of supervisors shall each obtain from the elections official a report on the cost-effectiveness of the proposed action.

(f) Within 30 days after the approval of the resolution, the elections official shall notify all registered voters of the
 districts affected by the consolidation of the approval of the resolution by the board of supervisors. The notice shall be delivered by mail and at the expense of the district.

(g) Public notices of the proceedings in which the resolution is to be considered for adoption shall be made pursuant to Section 25151 of the Government Code.

(h) If a special district is located in more than one county, the special district may not consolidate an election if any county in which the special district is located denies the request for consolidation.

(i) If, pursuant to subdivision (b), a special district election is held on the same day as the statewide general election, those governing body members whose terms of office would have,
 prior to the adoption of the resolution, expired prior to that election shall, instead, continue in their offices until their successors are elected and qualified, but in no event shall the term be extended beyond December 31 of the year following the year in which the request for consolidation is approved by the board of supervisors.

(j) If a board of supervisors approves the resolution pursuant to subdivision (e), the special district election shall be conducted on the date specified by the board of supervisors, in accordance with subdivision (a), unless the approval is later rescinded by the board of supervisors.

(k) If the date of a special district election is changed pursuant to this section, at least one election shall be held before the resolution, as approved by the
 board of supervisors, may be subsequently repealed or amended.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 731, Sec. 5.   (AB 1535)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

10404.5.

(a) A resolution of the governing board of a school district or county board of education to establish an election day pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 1302 shall be adopted and submitted to the board of supervisors not later than 240 days prior to the date of the currently scheduled election of the district or for the members of the county board of education.

(b) The final date for the submission of the resolution by the governing board of a school district or county board of education to the board of supervisors is not subject to waiver.

(c) The board of supervisors shall notify all school districts and the county board of education located in the county of the receipt of the resolution to consolidate and shall request input from each district on the effect of consolidation.

(d) (1) The board of supervisors, within 60 days from the date of submission, shall approve the resolution unless it finds that the ballot style, voting equipment, or computer capacity is such that additional elections or materials cannot be handled. Prior to the adoption of a resolution to either approve or deny a consolidation request, the board or boards of supervisors may obtain from the elections official a report on the cost-effectiveness of the proposed action.

(2) Public notices of the proceedings in which the resolution is to be considered for adoption shall be made pursuant to Section 25151 of the Government Code.

(e) Within 30 days after the approval of the resolution by the board of supervisors, the elections official shall notify all registered voters of the districts affected by the consolidation of the approval of the resolution by the board of supervisors. The notice shall be delivered by mail and at the expense of the school district or if applicable, the county board of education.

(f) An election day established pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 1302 shall be prescribed to occur not less than one month, nor more than 12 months, subsequent to the election day prescribed in Section 5000 of the Education Code or pursuant to Section 1007 of the Education Code, as appropriate. As used in this subdivision, “12 months” means the period from the election day prescribed in Section 5000 of the Education Code or pursuant to Section 1007 of the Education Code, as appropriate, to the first Tuesday after the first Monday in the 12th month subsequent to that day, inclusive.

(g) In the event that the election day for a school district governing board or county board of education is established pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 1302, the term of office of all then incumbent members of that governing board or county board of education shall be extended accordingly.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 227, Sec. 16.   Effective August 16, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

10404.7.

A school district in Tehama County or the Tehama County Board of Education, by itself or in concert with other school districts or county boards of education, may purchase or otherwise contribute to the purchase of elections equipment, including, but not limited to, a computer for the purposes of conducting a consolidated election when the equipment shall be owned by Tehama County.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1143, Sec. 50.   Effective September 30, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

10405.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Registrar-Recorder of the County of Los Angeles and the Registrar of Voters of Orange County may, pursuant to agreement between those counties, perform, either on behalf of the other, any and all duties relating to the conducting of the election, the counting of votes, and any other election procedures to the extent that those duties are for the conduct of an election of governing board members for any school district whose territory lies within both the County of Los Angeles and Orange County, pursuant to the consolidation of that election with a primary, municipal, or general election under Sections 1302 and 10404.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 810, Sec. 18.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

10405.7.

(a) The resolution of the community college district governing board to establish an election day pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 1302 shall be adopted and submitted to the board of supervisors not later than 240 days prior to the date of the currently scheduled election for the governing board members of the community college district.

(b) The final date for the submission of the resolution by the community college district governing board to the board of supervisors is not subject to waiver.

(c) The board of supervisors shall notify all community college districts located in the county of the
 receipt of the resolution to consolidate and shall request input from each district on the effect of consolidation.

(d) (1) The board of supervisors, within 60 days from the date of submission, shall approve the resolution unless it finds that the ballot style, voting equipment, or computer capacity is such that additional elections or materials cannot be handled. Prior to the adoption of a resolution to either approve or deny a consolidation request, the board or boards of supervisors may each obtain from the elections official a report on the cost-effectiveness of the proposed action.

(2) Public notices of the proceedings in which the resolution is to be considered for adoption shall be made pursuant to Section 25151 of the Government Code.

(e) Within 30
 days after the approval of the resolution by the board of supervisors, the elections official shall notify all registered voters of the districts affected by the consolidation of the approval of the resolution by the board of supervisors. The notice shall be delivered by mail and at the expense of the community college district.

(f) An election day established pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 1302 shall be prescribed to occur not less than one month, nor more than 12 months, subsequent to the election day prescribed in Section 5000 of the Education Code. As used in this subdivision, “12 months” means the period from the election day prescribed in Section 5000 of the Education Code to the first Tuesday after the first Monday in the 12th month subsequent to that day, inclusive.

(g) If, pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 1302, a district governing board member election is held on the same day as a statewide general election, those district governing board members whose four-year terms of office would have, prior to the adoption of the resolution, expired prior to that election shall, instead, continue in their offices until successors are elected and qualified.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 118, Sec. 2.   (AB 1412)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

10405.8.

In a community college district that includes the trustee areas authorized to be established pursuant to the third paragraph of Section 72023 of the Education Code, the consolidation of the election of trustees on the same date as the statewide general election pursuant to Section 10405.7 may be approved by any county or counties for the trustee areas located entirely within that county or counties. The approval of any county or counties in which the other trustee areas are located shall not be required. Elections resulting from changes in election dates pursuant to this section shall be deemed to meet the requirement of staggered terms set forth in Section 72023 of the Education Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1143, Sec. 52.   Effective September 30, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

10406.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, if a statewide special election is called less than 88 days prior to the date of that election, a district, city, or other political subdivision may call for a special local election for the submission of any question, proposition, or office to be filled, to be consolidated with the statewide special election if the call is issued within four days from the date of issuance of the Governor’s proclamation or the effective date of a statute calling for a statewide special election.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

10407.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, whenever other elections are consolidated with a regularly scheduled election, the period for the filing of nomination documents by candidates in elections consolidated with the regularly scheduled election shall commence on the 113th day before the election. The nomination documents shall be filed not later than the close of business on the 88th day before the regularly scheduled election in the office of the appropriate officer, during regular office hours.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), if nomination documents for an incumbent officer of a political subdivision are not filed by the close of business on the 88th day before the
 election, or are filed but then are withdrawn before the close of normal business
 hours on the 88th day before the election, any person other than the person who was the incumbent on the 88th day shall have until the close of business on the 83rd day before the election to file nomination documents for the elective office. This section is not applicable where there is no incumbent eligible to be elected.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 355, Sec. 12.   (AB 1784)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

10408.

When the county precinct boundaries at a consolidated election called by the board of supervisors of the county in which the city, district or other political subdivision is located do not coincide with the boundaries of the city, district or other political subdivision, the board of supervisors may by order, and for the purpose of the election only, reprecinct the territory in which the boundaries do not coincide, at any time prior to 30 days before the election.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

10409.

When the boundaries of the territory within which an election is to be held, or the boundaries of the precincts established therefor, do not fully coincide with the boundaries of the territory within which some other election is to be held, or the boundaries of the precincts established for the other election, the elections may be consolidated as to all precincts which are the same for both elections. The elections may also be consolidated as to those precincts where a single precinct established for one election lies entirely within a single precinct established for the other election. Separate ballots shall be provided for those voters who reside outside the territory within which one of the elections is called.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

10410.

Within the territory affected by the order of consolidation, the election precincts, polling places and voting booths shall, in every case, be the same, and there shall be only one set of election officers in each of the precincts. When the returns of elections consolidated pursuant to this part are required to be canvassed by different canvassing boards, the elections shall be conducted separately in the same manner as if they had not been consolidated, except as provided in this part.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

10411.

In case of the consolidation of any election called by the legislative body of a city, district, or other political subdivision with an election held in the county or counties in which the city, district, or other political subdivision is situated, the governing body of the city, district, or other political subdivision may authorize the board of supervisors to canvass the returns of the election. If this authority is given:

(a) The election shall be held in all respects as if there were only one election.

(b) Only one form of ballot shall be used.

(c) The returns of the election need not be canvassed by the legislative body of the authorizing city, district or other political subdivision.

If the authority is given to the board of supervisors, the canvass shall be made in accordance with Article 1 (commencing with Section 15300) of Chapter 4 of Division 15.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 811, Sec. 21.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

10412.
